Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1519
Political subdivision; evaluation; application fee; costs; refund.

Any political subdivision requesting an evaluation authorized under section 81-1517 shall submit a request on a form approved by the department and provide the department with an application fee not to exceed five thousand dollars. If the costs of the department exceed the initial deposit, the department and political subdivision shall enter into an agreement establishing a schedule for the payment of additional costs by the political subdivision. After the completion of the environmental infrastructure sustainability evaluation, any balance of funds paid under this section shall be refunded to the political subdivision.

Laws 2015, LB413, § 5.